Maryland, session 2026, SB0378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
23–111.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affiliated service” means a book–gifting service performed by a
nonprofit organization that is tax exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or
– 1 –

Ch. 625 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
a unit of State, county, or municipal government that forms an affiliated partnership with
an early reader organization.
(3) “Early reader organization” means a nonprofit organization:
(i) That is tax exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
and
(ii) Whose mission is to distribute to children free, high–quality books
designed to aid the development of reading skills.
(4) “Program” means the Young Readers [Matching] Grant Program.
(b) There is a Young Readers [Matching] Grant Program in the State Library
Agency.
(c) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to public libraries and
affiliated services to:
(1) Support the establishment and operation of affiliated services; and
(2) Contribute [an amount equal to the amount of funding provided for] TO
the operation of an affiliated service.
(d) The State Librarian shall administer the Program.
(e) (1) A public library or an affiliated service may submit an application for a
program grant on the form that the State Librarian requires.
(2) An application for a program grant shall include a plan to ensure that
the public library or the affiliated service is able to gift books to eligible children, including
SPECIFIC MEASURES FOR SERVING children in low–income zip codes within its area of
service.
(3) A program grant shall be disbursed to a public library or an affiliated
service that qualifies for the Program.
(f) The State Library Board shall:
(1) On or before December 1, 2024, and every other year thereafter, report to
the General Assembly on the effectiveness of the Program in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article; and
(2) Collect statistics and other information necessary for this purpose.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(g) For each fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation of [$350,000] $450,000 to the Program.
23–202.
(b) Each regional resource center shall provide, through mutual cooperation and
coordination, books, information, and other material and service resources that an
individual library cannot provide adequately by itself.
23–205.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (g) of this section, each year each participating
regional resource center shall receive a minimum amount of funding for each resident of
the area served, to be used for operating and capital expenses.
(2) The allocation shall be calculated as follows:
(i) [For each of fiscal years 2011 through 2015.... $6.75 per each
resident of the area served;
(ii) For fiscal year 2016........................................ $6.95 per each
resident of the area served;
(iii) For fiscal year 2017........................................ $7.15 per each
resident of the area served;
(iv) For fiscal year 2018........................................ $7.55 per each
resident of the area served;
(v) For fiscal year 2019........................................ $7.95 per each
resident of the area served;
(vi) For fiscal year 2020........................................ $8.35 per each
resident of the area served;
(vii) For fiscal year 2021........................................ $8.55 per each
resident of the area served;
(viii)] For fiscal year 2022........................................ $8.75 per each
resident of the area served;
[(ix)] (II) For fiscal year 2023........................................ $9.19 per
each resident of the area served;
[(x)] (III) For fiscal year 2024........................................ $9.39 per
each resident of the area served;
– 3 –

Ch. 625 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(xi)] (IV) For fiscal year 2025........................................ $9.59 per
each resident of the area served;
[(xii)] (V) For fiscal year 2026........................................ $9.79 per
each resident of the area served; [and]
[(xiii)] (VI) For fiscal year 2027 [and each fiscal year
thereafter]................................................................................................... $9.99 per each
resident of the area served;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028....................................... $10.29
$10.19 PER EACH RESIDENT OF THE AREA SERVED;
(VIII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029....................................... $10.60
$10.40 PER EACH RESIDENT OF THE AREA SERVED;
(IX) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030....................................... $10.92
$10.60 PER EACH RESIDENT OF THE AREA SERVED;
(X) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031....................................... $11.24
$10.81 PER EACH RESIDENT OF THE AREA SERVED; AND
(XI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER....................................... $11.58 $11.02 PER EACH RESIDENT OF THE
AREA SERVED.
23–410.
[Beginning January 1, 2024, each] EACH public library must offer at least one of the
following services alone or in partnership with units of government or nonprofit
organizations:
(1) [A program to increase scores on the kindergarten assessment
administered under § 7–210 of this article;
(2) A program designed to close learning gaps created by lack of access to
education, including learning gaps that occurred during the COVID–19 pandemic;
(3) An initiative to expand digital equity and access to free computing and
broadband Internet;
(4) An educational program providing technology instruction and skills,
health literacy, instruction on operating a small business, and instruction on workforce
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
development] A PROGRAM DESIGNED TO INCREASE EARLY CHILDHOOD LITERACY
AND LEARNING, SCHOOL READINESS, LITERACY PROFICIENCY, AND STUDENT
SUCCESS;
(2) AN EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM THAT ADVANCES INFORMATION
LITERACY, TECHNOLOGY INSTRUCTION AND SKILLS, AND ECONOMIC, CAREER, AND
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT;
(3) AN INITIATIVE THAT INCREASES DIGITAL EQUITY AND ACCESS TO
THE INTERNET;
[(5)] (4) Serving as a community resource and distribution site during
public emergencies; AND
[(6) A program to reduce barriers to STEM education, including by
providing activities, classes, programs, and events; and
(7)] (5) Support for mental health and [reducing social and physical
isolation] PERSONAL WELL–BEING.
23–503.
(a) (1) The entire capital and operating cost of the minimum library program
for this State as a whole shall be shared as provided in this subsection.
(2) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the State shall provide:
(i) Approximately 40 percent of the total cost of the minimum
program; and
(ii) Not less than 20 percent of the cost of the minimum program in
any county.
(3) The counties participating in the program together shall provide
through local taxes approximately 60 percent of the total statewide cost of the minimum
program.
(b) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, each county public library
system that participates in the minimum library program shall be provided for each
resident of the county, to be used for operating and capital expenses:
(i) [For each of fiscal years 2011 through 2015 – $14.00;
(ii) For fiscal year 2016 – $14.27;
– 5 –

Ch. 625 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) For fiscal year 2017 – $14.54;
(iv) For fiscal year 2018 – $15.00;
(v) For fiscal year 2019 – $15.50;
(vi) For fiscal year 2020 – $16.00;
(vii) For fiscal year 2021 – $16.43;
(viii)] For fiscal year 2022 – $17.10;
[(ix)] (II) For fiscal year 2023 – $17.50;
[(x)] (III) For fiscal year 2024 – $17.90;
[(xi)] (IV) For fiscal year 2025 – $18.30;
[(xii)] (V) For fiscal year 2026 – $18.70; [and]
[(xiii)] (VI) For fiscal year 2027 [and each fiscal year thereafter] –
$19.10;
(VII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 – $19.71 $19.50;
(VIII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029 – $20.35 $19.92;
(IX) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030 – $21.00 $20.32;
(X) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031 – $21.67 $20.74; AND
(XI) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER – $22.37 $21.15.
(2) (i) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the State shall share in
this amount.
(ii) Any county may provide an amount greater than its share under
the cooperative program, but the State may not share in the excess.
(c) Any employer Social Security contributions required by federal law for any
employee in a county public library system shall remain the obligation of the employer.
(d) (1) Receipt of State funding for a county library system that participates in
the minimum library program under this section is contingent on the board of library
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
trustees adopting a written policy for operation of the county library system that is
consistent with the State standards for libraries.
(2) (i) The Comptroller shall withhold all State funds from a county
library system that the State Library Board certifies has failed to meet the State standards
for libraries.
(ii) The Comptroller shall continue to withhold funds under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph until the State Library Board certifies that the county
library system has adopted a written policy consistent with the State standards for
libraries.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 7 –